Hawaii statutes.
§351-82 Effect of conviction upon contract;
deposit of monetary compensation with the commission. If the person
indicted or charged is subsequently convicted, the person, firm, corporation,
partnership, association, or other legal entity which entered into a contract
of the type identified in section 351-81 shall:

(1) Deposit fifty per cent of the monetary
compensation paid under such contract into a collection account established by
the commission pursuant to section 351-83 and deposit the other fifty per
cent of such monetary compensation in a special account established by the
commission pursuant to section 351-84 if a timely appeal from the
conviction is filed and the contract provides that monetary compensation is
payable to the convicted person; or

(2) Deposit all monetary compensation paid under such
contract with the commission to a special account established pursuant to
section 351-84, if a timely appeal from the conviction is:

(A) Filed and the contract provides that the
monetary compensation is payable to a person other than the convicted person;

(B) Filed, the conviction is affirmed on
appeal, and no further appellate action is allowed; or

(C) Not filed. [L 1986, c 155, pt of §1; am L
1998, c 240, §5]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next